Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CENTENNIAL BARNS REGISTRY.new text end new text begin $50,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the governing board of the Minnesota Historical Society for creating and operating the Centennial Barns Registry to allow land owners to voluntarily register their barns built before 1959 and provide information on the history and location of historic barn structures throughout the state. new text end